lexc/verb/enhuige.lexc
LEXICON Nrepaszt
+Inf:^+cInf^ni  #;
+Inf11:^+ccInf11^n§igeoue§m #;
+Inf12:^+ccInf12^n§igeoue§d #;
+Inf13:^+ccInf13^ni§AA§ #;
+Inf21:^+ccInf21^n§igeu§nk #;
+Inf22:^+ccInf22^n§igeoue§t§igeoue§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeu§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeuo§k #;
+Advan:^+ccAdvan^v§igeaa§n #;
+Adv:^+cAdv^v§AA§  #;
+Rep:^+cRep^g§AA§t  Potaszt;
                    Potaszt;

LEXICON Potaszt
+Inf:^+cInf^ni  #;
+Inf11:^+ccInf11^n§igeoue§m #;
+Inf12:^+ccInf12^n§igeoue§d #;
+Inf13:^+ccInf13^ni§AA§ #;
+Inf21:^+ccInf21^n§igeu§nk #;
+Inf22:^+ccInf22^n§igeoue§t§igeoue§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeu§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeuo§k #;
+Advan:^+ccAdvan^v§igeaa§n #;
+Adv:^+cAdv^v§AA§  #;
+Pot:^+cPot^h§AAA§t  AddInfaszt;
             Caseaszt;

!LEXICON Potaszt1
!+Pot:^+cPot^h§AAA§t  AddInfaszt;
!             Caseaszt;

LEXICON AddInfaszt
+Inf:^+cInf^ni  #;
+Inf11:^+ccInf11^n§igeoue§m #;
+Inf12:^+ccInf12^n§igeoue§d #;
+Inf13:^+ccInf13^ni§AA§ #;
+Inf21:^+ccInf21^n§igeu§nk #;
+Inf22:^+ccInf22^n§igeoue§t§igeoue§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeu§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeuo§k #;
+Advan:^+ccAdvan^v§igeaa§n #;
+Adv:^+cAdv^v§AA§  #;
              Caseaszt;

LEXICON Caseaszt
+IndefSg1:^+cIndefSg1^§igeo§k    #;    ! ek/ok
+IndefSg2:^+cIndefSg2^§szorelol§ #;    ! esz, el/ol
+IndefSg3:^+cIndefSg3^           #;    !
+IndefPl1:^+cIndefPl1^§igeu§nk   #;    ! ünk/unk
+IndefPl2:^+cIndefPl2^t§igeo2§k  #;    ! tek/tok
+IndefPl3:^+cIndefPl3^n§igea§k   #;    ! nek/nak
+DefSg1:^+cDefSg1^§igeo§m        #;    ! em/om
+DefSg2:^+cDefSg2^§igee§d        #;    ! ed/od
+DefSg3:^+cDefSg3^§igeija1§       #;    ! i/sa
+DefPl1:^+cDefPl1^§j§§igeu§k      #;    ! jük/suk
+DefPl2:^+cDefPl2^§igejatokitek1§ #;    ! itek/sátok
+DefPl3:^+cDefPl3^§igejakik1§     #;    ! ik/sák
+ConjIndefSg1:^+cConjIndefSg1^§sj§§igea§k     #;
+ConjIndefSg2:^+cConjIndefSg2^§sj§§igeaa§l    #;
+ConjIndefSg2:^+cConjIndefSg2^§sj§ék          #;
+ConjIndefSg2:^+cConjIndefSg2^§sj§           #;
+ConjIndefSg3:^+cConjIndefSg3^§sj§§igeo§n     #;
+ConjIndefPl1:^+cConjIndefPl1^§sj§§igeu§nk    #;
+ConjIndefPl2:^+cConjIndefPl2^§sj§§igea§t§igeo§k       #;
+ConjIndefPl3:^+cConjIndefPl3^§sj§§igea§n§igea§k      #;
+ConjDefSg1:^+cConjDefSg1^§sj§§igea§m         #;
+ConjDefSg2[lfea]:^+cConjDefSg2^§sj§§igea§d         #;
+ConjDefSg2[lfea]:^+cConjDefSg2^§sj§d              #;
+ConjDefSg3:^+cConjDefSg3^§sj§§igea§          #;
+ConjDefPl1:^+cConjDefPl1^§sj§§igeu§k         #;
+ConjDefPl2:^+cConjDefPl2^§sj§§igeaa§t§igeo§k     #;
+ConjDefPl3:^+cConjDefSg1^§sj§§igeaa§k            #;
+PastIndefSg1:^+cPIndefSg1^t§AA§m            #;    ! tem/tam
+PastIndefSg2:^+cPIndefSg2^t§igeaa§l         #;    ! tál/tél
+PastIndefSg3:^+cPIndefSg3^§igetattet§t      #;    ! t
+PastIndefPl1:^+cPIndefPl1^t§igeu§nk         #;    ! tünk/tunk
+PastIndefPl2:^+cPIndefPl2^t§igea§t§igeo2§k  #;    ! tetek/tatok
+PastIndefPl3:^+cPIndefPl3^t§igea§k          #;    ! tek/tak
+PastDefSg1:^+cPDefSg1^t§igea§m              #;    ! tem/tam
+PastDefSg2:^+cPDefSg2^t§igea§d              #;    ! tad/ted
+PastDefSg3:^+cPDefSg3^t§igea§               #;    ! ta/te
+PastDefPl1:^+cPDefPl1^t§igeu§k              #;    ! tuk/tük
+PastDefPl2:^+cPDefPl2^t§igeaa§t§igeo2§k     #;    ! tátok/tétek
+PastDefPl3:^+cPDefPl3^t§igeaa§k             #;    ! ták/ték
+CondIndefSg1:^+cCIndefSg1^nék               #;    ! nék
+CondIndefSg2:^+cCIndefSg2^n§igeaa§l         #;    ! nál/nél
+CondIndefSg3:^+cCIndefSg3^n§igea§           #;    ! na/ne
+CondIndefPl1:^+cCIndefPl1^n§igeaa§nk            #;    ! nánk/nénk
+CondIndefPl1:^+cCIndefPl1^n§igeoo§k #;
+CondIndefPl2:^+cCIndefPl2^n§igeaa§t§igeo§k      #;    ! nátok/nétek
+CondIndefPl3:^+cCIndefPl3^n§igeaa§n§igea§k      #;    ! nának/nének
+CondDefSg1:^+cCDefSg1^n§igeaa§m                 #;    ! nám/ném
+CondDefSg2:^+cCDefSg2^n§igeaa§d                 #;    ! nád/néd
+CondDefSg3:^+cCDefSg3^n§igeaa§                  #;    ! ná/né
+CondDefPl1:^+cCDefPl1^n§igeaa§nk                #;    ! nánk/nénk
+CondDefPl2:^+cCDefPl2^n§igeaa§t§igeo§k          #;    ! nátok/nétek
+CondDefPl3:^+cCDefPl3^n§igeaa§k                 #;    ! nák/nék
+IndefSg12:^+cIndefSgp12^§l§§igea§k           #;    !
+ConjDefSg12:^+cConjDefSgp12^§sj§§igea§l§igea§k          #;
+PastDefSg12:^+cPDefSgp12^t§igea§l§igea§k               #;    ! ta/te
+CondDefSg12:^+cCDefSgp12^n§igeaa§l§igea§k                  #;    ! ná/né

LEXICON AddVerbaszt1
[stem]+Verb[gcat]:0     Imperaszt1;

LEXICON Imperaszt1
!+Inf:^+cInf^szt§ae2§ni  #;
!+Advan:^+ccAdvan^v§igeaa§n #;
!+Adv:^+cAdv^v§AA§  #;
+Imper:^+cImp^szt  Nrepaszt1;
                      Nrep1aszt1;

LEXICON Nrepaszt1
+Inf:^+cInf^ni  #;
+Inf11:^+ccInf11^n§igeoue§m #;
+Inf12:^+ccInf12^n§igeoue§d #;
+Inf13:^+ccInf13^ni§AA§ #;
+Inf21:^+ccInf21^n§igeu§nk #;
+Inf22:^+ccInf22^n§igeoue§t§igeoue§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeu§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeuo§k #;
+Advan:^+ccAdvan^v§igeaa§n #;
+Adv:^+cAdv^v§AA§  #;
+Rep:^+cNrep^g§AA§t  NImperaszt1;
                      NImperaszt1;
LEXICON Nrep1aszt1
+Rep:^+cNrep^dg§AA§t  NImperaszt1;
                      NImper1aszt1;

LEXICON NImperaszt1
+Inf:^+cInf^ni  #;
+Inf11:^+ccInf11^n§igeoue§m #;
+Inf12:^+ccInf12^n§igeoue§d #;
+Inf13:^+ccInf13^ni§AA§ #;
+Inf21:^+ccInf21^n§igeu§nk #;
+Inf22:^+ccInf22^n§igeoue§t§igeoue§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeu§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeuo§k #;
+Advan:^+ccAdvan^v§igeaa§n #;
+Adv:^+cAdv^v§AA§  #;
+Imper:^+cImp^t§AA§t  Pot1aszt1;
                      Potaszt2;

LEXICON NImper1aszt1
+Imper:^+cImp^szt  Potaszt11;
!                      Caseaszt2;

LEXICON Potaszt11
+Inf:^+cInf^ni  #;
+Inf11:^+ccInf11^n§igeoue§m #;
+Inf12:^+ccInf12^n§igeoue§d #;
+Inf13:^+ccInf13^ni§AA§ #;
+Inf21:^+ccInf21^n§igeu§nk #;
+Inf22:^+ccInf22^n§igeoue§t§igeoue§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeu§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeuo§k #;
+Advan:^+ccAdvan^v§igeaa§n #;
+Adv:^+cAdv^v§AA§  #;
+Pot:^+cPot^h§AAA§t  AddInfaszt11;
             Caseaszt2;

LEXICON Pot1aszt1
+Inf:^+cInf^ni  #;
+Inf11:^+ccInf11^n§igeoue§m #;
+Inf12:^+ccInf12^n§igeoue§d #;
+Inf13:^+ccInf13^ni§AA§ #;
+Inf21:^+ccInf21^n§igeu§nk #;
+Inf22:^+ccInf22^n§igeoue§t§igeoue§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeu§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeuo§k #;
+Advan:^+ccAdvan^v§igeaa§n #;
+Adv:^+cAdv^v§AA§  #;
+Pot:^+cPot^h§AAA§t  AddInfaszt11;
             Caseaszt1;

LEXICON Potaszt2
+Pot:^+cPot^h§AAA§t  AddInfaszt11;
             Caseaszt1;

LEXICON AddInfaszt11
+Inf:^+cInf^ni  #;
+Inf11:^+ccInf11^n§igeoue§m #;
+Inf12:^+ccInf12^n§igeoue§d #;
+Inf13:^+ccInf13^ni§AA§ #;
+Inf21:^+ccInf21^n§igeu§nk #;
+Inf22:^+ccInf22^n§igeoue§t§igeoue§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeu§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeuo§k #;
+Advan:^+ccAdvan^v§igeaa§n #;
+Adv:^+cAdv^v§AA§  #;
            Caseaszt1;

LEXICON Verb
akad:aka AddVerbaszt1;
alvad:alva AddVerbaszt1;
apad:apa AddVerbaszt1;
borzad:borza AddVerbaszt1;
bágyad:bágya AddVerbaszt1;
csihad:csiha AddVerbaszt1;
dagad:daga AddVerbaszt1;
duzzad:duzza AddVerbaszt1;
fakad:faka AddVerbaszt1;
fonnyad:fonnya AddVerbaszt1;
forrad:forra AddVerbaszt1;
fullad:fulla AddVerbaszt1;
fárad:fára AddVerbaszt1;
guvad:guva AddVerbaszt1;
gyullad:gyulla AddVerbaszt1;
hamvad:hamva AddVerbaszt1;
hervad:herva AddVerbaszt1;
higgad:higga AddVerbaszt1;
horgad:horga AddVerbaszt1;
horpad:horpa AddVerbaszt1;
izzad:izza AddVerbaszt1;
korhad:korha AddVerbaszt1;
kornyad:kornya AddVerbaszt1;
kushad:kusha AddVerbaszt1;
kókad:kóka AddVerbaszt1;
lankad:lanka AddVerbaszt1;
lappad:lappa AddVerbaszt1;
lohad:loha AddVerbaszt1;
lottyad:lottya AddVerbaszt1;
lukad:luka AddVerbaszt1;
lyukad:lyuka AddVerbaszt1;
lábad:lába AddVerbaszt1;
marad:mara AddVerbaszt1;
mállad:málla AddVerbaszt1;
nyuvad:nyuva AddVerbaszt1;
olvad:olva AddVerbaszt1;
ottmarad:ottmara AddVerbaszt1;
pirkad:pirka AddVerbaszt1;
porhad:porha AddVerbaszt1;
porlad:porla AddVerbaszt1;
poshad:posha AddVerbaszt1;
puffad:puffa AddVerbaszt1;
pukkad:pukka AddVerbaszt1;
ragad:raga AddVerbaszt1;
riad:ria AddVerbaszt1;
rohad:roha AddVerbaszt1;
roskad:roska AddVerbaszt1;
rothad:rotha AddVerbaszt1;
sarjad:sarja AddVerbaszt1;
sikkad:sikka AddVerbaszt1;
sorvad:sorva AddVerbaszt1;
suvad:suva AddVerbaszt1;
szakad:szaka AddVerbaszt1;
szalad:szala AddVerbaszt1;
szikkad:szikka AddVerbaszt1;
szunnyad:szunnya AddVerbaszt1;
sápad:sápa AddVerbaszt1;
tapad:tapa AddVerbaszt1;
tikkad:tikka AddVerbaszt1;
virrad:virra AddVerbaszt1;
zsibbad:zsibba AddVerbaszt1;
árad:ára AddVerbaszt1;
